Tennessee, session 114, SB2026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-105, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting the following:
The commissioner through rules and regulations shall establish procedures for
the payment of indemnities for animals destroyed under authority of this chapter.
Indemnity under this section shall be based on, but not limited to, the fair market value of
the animal and the availability of funds for that purpose. Partial reimbursement may be
allotted in lieu of fair market value if sufficient funds are not available. Indemnification
may be disallowed in cases where the owner is in violation of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2026
011943
- 1 -